Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1038
School funds; apportionment; formation of new district; when eligible.

When a district is formed from other districts where during the preceding school year school has been kept open the term required by law, such new district will be held and deemed to have had school the lawful time and apportionment shall be made to it accordingly.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision XI, § 5, p. 370;

R.S.1913, § 6932;

C.S.1922, § 6515;

C.S.1929, § 79-2004;

R.S.1943, § 79-2004;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 380, p. 819;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1305;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 684.